New York, session 2025-2026, S10669.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative intent. 1. The legislature hereby finds and 2 declares that: 3 (a) black carbon emissions, a byproduct of incomplete combustion from 4 industrial processes, transportation, and legacy pollution sources, are 5 a significant contributor to climate change and pose disproportionate 6 health risks to Indigenous and historically marginalized communities; 7 (b) lands connected to Indigenous Nations have experienced long-term 8 environmental burdens, including airborne and soil-deposited black 9 carbon contamination, impacting ecosystems, agriculture, and public 10 health; 11 (c) advances in material science and clean energy manufacturing now 12 enable the capture, refinement, and reuse of carbon-based materials for 13 high-value applications, including components used in photovoltaic tech- 14 nologies; 15 (d) the state of New York has established ambitious climate goals 16 under the climate leadership and community protection act, requiring 17 innovative solutions that integrate environmental remediation with 18 economic development; 19 (e) emerging solar technologies, including tilt-optimized photovoltaic 20 systems and agrivoltaic applications, provide opportunities to increase 21 land-use efficiency, support agricultural productivity, and expand 22 renewable energy deployment; and 23 (f) Indigenous Nations possess critical ecological knowledge and must 24 be full partners in environmental restoration, resource management, and 25 clean energy development. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD16158-01-6 S. 10669 2 1 2. It is therefore the intent of the legislature to establish a pilot 2 program that: 3 (a) captures and remediates black carbon pollution; 4 (b) enables Indigenous-led participation and governance; 5 (c) supports in-state manufacturing of advanced solar technologies; 6 and 7 (d) deploys innovative solar systems across New York state. 8 § 2. The environmental conservation law is amended by adding a new 9 section 19-0333 to read as follows: 10 § 19-0333. Indigenous black carbon recovery and clean energy manufactur- 11 ing pilot program. 12 1. For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have 13 the following meanings: 14 (a) "pilot program" means the indigenous black carbon recovery and 15 clean energy manufacturing pilot program; 16 (b) "black carbon" means particulate matter produced from incomplete 17 combustion of fossil fuels, biomass, and other carbon-based materials; 18 (c) "participating Indigenous Nations" means federally recognized or 19 state-recognized Native American tribes with historical, ancestral, or 20 present ties to the capital district or surrounding regions; 21 (d) "recovered carbon material" means black carbon that has been 22 captured, processed, and refined for reuse in industrial or technolog- 23 ical applications; 24 (e) "advanced solar technologies" means photovoltaic systems includ- 25 ing, but not limited to: 26 (i) tilt-optimized solar panels; 27 (ii) agrivoltaic systems combining agriculture and solar generation; 28 and 29 (iii) carbon-enhanced photovoltaic materials; and 30 (f) "capital district" means the region of the state containing Alba- 31 ny, Columbia, Greene, Saratoga, Schenectady, Rensselaer, Warren, and 32 Washington counties. 33 2. (a) There is hereby established the indigenous black carbon recov- 34 ery and clean energy manufacturing pilot program. The pilot program 35 shall operate within: 36 (i) the capital district; and 37 (ii) any additional regions identified in consultation with partic- 38 ipating indigenous nations. 39 (b) The pilot program shall be jointly administered by: 40 (i) the state of New York; 41 (ii) participating Indigenous nations; and 42 (iii) designated research, manufacturing, and environmental partners. 43 3. (a) The state shall engage in formal government-to-government 44 consultation with participating Indigenous Nations. Such consultation 45 shall include: 46 (i) land use and remediation agreements; 47 (ii) carbon recovery and resource allocation frameworks; and 48 (iii) co-ownership opportunities in manufacturing and energy assets. 49 (b) Participating Indigenous Nations shall have meaningful decision- 50 making authority in: 51 (i) project design; 52 (ii) site selection; 53 (iii) implementation and deployment; and 54 (iv) long-term governance structures. 55 4. The pilot program shall include, but not be limited to: 56 (a) black carbon capture and remediation, including: S. 10669 3 1 (i) deployment of technologies to capture airborne and soil-based 2 black carbon; 3 (ii) cleanup of legacy contamination sites; and 4 (iii) monitoring of air quality and environmental health impacts; 5 (b) material processing and reuse, including: 6 (i) development of facilities to refine recovered carbon materials; 7 (ii) integration of carbon materials into photovoltaic and clean ener- 8 gy components; and 9 (iii) support for research partnerships with universities and private 10 sector innovators; 11 (c) in-state solar manufacturing, including: 12 (i) establishment of manufacturing capacity within New York state; and 13 (ii) production of tilt-optimized solar panels, agrivoltaic system 14 components and next-generation carbon-enhanced photovoltaic materials; 15 (d) deployment of advanced solar systems, including installation on: 16 (i) indigenous lands provided there is voluntary participation; 17 (ii) agricultural lands; 18 (iii) brownfield and remediated sites; and 19 (iv) public infrastructure; 20 (e) agrivoltaic integration including: 21 (i) dual-use systems enabling agricultural production and solar gener- 22 ation; 23 (ii) partnerships with local farmers and indigenous agricultural 24 programs; and 25 (iii) research into crop compatibility and yield optimization; and 26 (f) workforce development including: 27 (i) training programs prioritizing indigenous communities and local 28 residents; and 29 (ii) apprenticeships in environmental remediation, advanced manufac- 30 turing and solar installation and maintenance. 31 5. Priority shall be given to communities designated as disadvantaged 32 pursuant to the climate leadership and community protection act. At 33 least forty percent of pilot program benefits shall accrue to such 34 communities, including indigenous populations. 35 6. No project shall proceed without: 36 (a) free, prior, and informed consultation with affected indigenous 37 nations; and 38 (b) environmental and health impact assessments. 39 7. (a) The department shall submit an annual report to governor and 40 the legislature no later than December first of each year. The report 41 shall include the: 42 (i) reductions in black carbon pollution; 43 (ii) economic and job creation impacts; 44 (iii) indigenous ownership and participation metrics; and 45 (iv) solar energy generation and deployment outcomes. 46 (b) A comprehensive program evaluation shall be conducted after five 47 years. 48 7. Following a comprehensive program evaluation, the department may 49 expand the program statewide prioritizing regions with high pollution 50 burdens, renewable energy potential and opportunities for indigenous 51 partnership. 52 § 3. The sum of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000), or so much there- 53 of as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated to the department of 54 environmental conservation out of any moneys in the state treasury in 55 the general fund to the credit of the state purposes account, not other- 56 wise appropriated, and made immediately available, for the purpose of S. 10669 4 1 carrying out the provisions of this act. Such moneys shall be payable 2 on the audit and warrant of the comptroller on vouchers certified or 3 approved by the commissioner of the department of environmental conser- 4 vation in the manner prescribed by law. 5 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.